Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.030

Coordinator—Duties.

The director of the department shall appoint a coordinator that is responsible for:

(1) Managing, directing, inventorying, and coordinating state efforts to promote, develop, and encourage biofuel and energy efficiency, renewable energy, and innovative energy technology markets in Washington;

(2) Developing, coordinating, and overseeing the implementation of a plan, or series of plans, for the production, transport, distribution, and delivery of biofuels produced predominantly from recycled products or Washington feedstocks;

(3) Working with the departments of transportation and enterprise services, and other applicable state and local governmental entities and the private sector, to ensure the development of biofuel fueling stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle fleets, and to provide greater availability of public biofuel fueling stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle fleets;

(4) Coordinating with the Western Washington University alternative automobile program for opportunities to support new Washington state technology for conversion of fossil fuel fleets to biofuel, hybrid, or alternative fuel propulsion;

(5) Coordinating with the University of Washington's college of forest management and the Olympic natural resources center for the identification of barriers to using the state's forest resources for fuel production, including the economic and transportation barriers of physically bringing forest biomass to the market;

(6) Coordinating with the department of agriculture and Washington State University for the identification of other barriers for future biofuels development and development of strategies for furthering the penetration of the Washington state fossil fuel market with Washington produced biofuels, particularly among public entities.

[ 2015 c 225 s 92; 2009 c 451 s 4; 2007 c 348 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 451: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 11, 2009]." [ 2009 c 451 s 11.]

Intent—2009 c 451: "The legislature intends to modify the energy freedom program and account in order to receive federal funds and other sources of funding. Also, the legislature intends to expand the mission of the energy freedom program to accelerate energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, and deployment of innovative energy technologies. Additionally, the legislature intends to support, through the energy freedom program, research, demonstration, and commercialization of energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, and innovation energy technologies." [ 2009 c 451 s 1.]